Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Legislative Program Review and Investigations

6.900.
Definitions for KRS 6.900 to 6.935.

As used in KRS

6.900

to

6.935

:

“Committee” means the Legislative Oversight and Investigations Committee;

“Investigation” means an inquiry into possible acts of impropriety in the use of public funds or performance of public duty by a person;

“Person” means:

A current or former elected or appointed state official;

A state agency;

A current or former state employee;

A contractor who has responded to a request for proposal by a state agency, including those offered under KRS Chapter 45A;

An individual or entity responding to a request for contract by a state agency, including a personal service contract; or

Any private individual or entity doing business with anyone listed in paragraphs (a) to (e) of this subsection;

“Review” means a noninvestigative study of the operation, accomplishments, management, or activities of an agency or program and includes procedures such as fiscal audit, program/performance evaluation, program audit, management audit, policy analysis, or other related terms;

“Study” means any investigation or review initiated or undertaken by the committee; and

“State agency” means:

Any entity, including multijurisdictional organization or interagency entities, created by the Constitution of Kentucky, by an act of the General Assembly, or by any of the branches of state government or any of its subdivisions, instrumentalities, or affiliated organizations, or by any employee or official acting in his or her official capacity;

Any entity which receives any part of its funding or resources from state tax dollars, from funds or resources entrusted to the Commonwealth from other sources, or from fines, fees, licensing, or penalties authorized by state statute or administrative regulation;

Any entity which is federally funded and for which the Commonwealth of Kentucky is responsible for the oversight or expenditures of the federal resources;

That portion of a public or private entity which receives or has received resources, such as funds, equipment, property, supplies, or services, directly or indirectly from the Commonwealth of Kentucky; and

That portion of a public or private entity related to the delivery of services to or for the Commonwealth of Kentucky or an entity of the Commonwealth as defined in paragraph (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this subsection.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 79, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 2021 ch. 14, § 1, effective March 12, 2021.

6.905.
Legislative Oversight and Investigations Committee — Membership — Meetings — Vote required to act.

There is created a Legislative Oversight and Investigations Committee which shall be a permanent standing committee of the General Assembly, consisting of eight (8) members of the Senate, six (6) of whom shall be appointed by the President and two (2) of whom shall be appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate, and eight (8) members of the House of Representatives, six (6) of whom shall be appointed by the Speaker and two (2) of whom shall be appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives. At least one (1) appointee by each appointive authority shall be a member of the Senate or House Standing Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.

The President and the Speaker shall each appoint a co-chair and vice chair from their respective bodies. The co-chairs shall have joint responsibilities for committee meeting agendas and presiding at committee meetings. On an alternating basis, each co-chair shall have the first option to set the monthly meeting date. A monthly meeting may be canceled by agreement of both co-chairs. A majority of the entire membership of the Legislative Oversight and Investigations Committee shall constitute a quorum, and all actions of the committee shall be by vote of a majority of its entire membership.

Each member of the committee shall receive the same travel allowances and compensation for attending interim meetings of the committee as are received by members of subcommittees of the Legislative Research Commission under KRS 7.090(3).

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 254, § 1, effective March 30, 1978; 1980, ch. 328, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 356, § 1, effective January 1, 1983; 1992, ch. 79, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 486, §§ 8, 36, effective July 15, 1994; 2001, ch. 125, § 1, effective June 21, 2001; 2003, ch. 185, § 1, effective March 31, 2003; 2021 ch. 14, § 2, effective March 12, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(3/31/2003). In codifying the 2003 Regular Session changes to this statute, the Reviser of Statutes, under the authority of KRS

7.136

, has changed an existing reference in subsection (4) of this statute from “KRS

7.090

(2)” to “KRS

7.090

(3).” In codification following the 1982 Regular Session, subsection (2) of KRS 7.090 was renumbered as subsection (3), but the necessary adjustment to the reference in this statute was not made.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The authority under which superintendents and boards must respond to questions raised in the course of investigation by the Office of Education Accountability is found in KRS

7.410

and KRS

6.905

et seq.

OAG 91-222

.

6.910.
Purpose, powers, and duties of committee — Confidentiality of working papers and other information — Closed meetings authorized — Witnesses — Subpoenas.

The purpose of the Legislative Oversight and Investigations Committee shall be to serve as the main investigative committee in the General Assembly. The committee shall have the authority to investigate the subjects within the committee’s legislative jurisdiction and within the jurisdiction of other standing or statutory committees of the General Assembly.

The committee shall have the discretionary power to:

Make studies of the operations of state agencies to ascertain that sums appropriated have been, or are being, expended for the purposes for which such appropriations were made and to evaluate the effectiveness of programs in accomplishing legislative intent;

Study on a continuing basis the operations, practices, and duties of state agencies, as they relate to efficiency in the utilization of space, personnel, equipment, and facilities;

Make such special studies and reports of the operations and functions of state agencies as it deems appropriate and as may be requested by the General Assembly;

Make such reports on its findings and recommendations at such time and in such manner as the committee deems proper, submitting such reports to the agencies concerned, to the Governor and to the General Assembly. Such reports shall relate to the following matters:

Whether any state agency is carrying out only those activities or programs authorized by legal or administrative action; or

Whether the programs and activities of a state agency, or a particular program or activity is being operated efficiently, effectively, or in accordance with legislative or administrative intent; or

Whether there is a need for change in any authorized activity or program of a state agency; or

Whether any reorganization of a state agency, or group of state agencies, is needed or justified to accomplish the results of programs or activities; or

Any combination of the purposes specified in this or any other section of KRS

6.900

to

6.935

;

Treat information obtained or prepared by the committee or its staff as confidential working papers subject to release according to the operating rules and procedures adopted by the committee, and such information shall be exempt from the open records requirements contained in KRS

61.870

to

61.884

. The committee may close certain meetings and project briefings to protect research pursuant to KRS

61.805

to

61.850

, to allow the exchange of confidential materials, and information, to protect the identity of witnesses, when necessary, and to protect the integrity of the study. Any information protected by federal laws shall not be subject to public release;

Consider and act on requests for studies submitted by legislators, legislative committees, elected officials of state government, state cabinet secretaries, and department and agency heads. Requests shall be submitted in writing and shall state reasons to support the request. The decision of the committee to grant or deny such a request shall be final;

Review any conditions or circumstances that may indicate the necessity or desirability of enacting new or additional legislation addressing subjects within its jurisdiction or the jurisdiction of any standing or statutory committee;

Evaluate the effect of laws enacted to reorganize any branch of state government;

Conduct studies directed by joint resolution of the General Assembly;

When the General Assembly is not in session, conduct studies:

Initiated by joint agreement of the co- chairs;

Initiated by a majority vote of the committee; or

Requested by the Legislative Research Commission or an interim joint committee thereof. In the event two (2) or more studies are requested, the priority among them shall be determined by the committee;

After voting to undertake a review under paragraph (j)(2.) of this subsection, the committee shall notify the chair of the committee of relevant jurisdiction;

To determine if a witness should be prosecuted for perjury by testifying falsely before the committee, and to institute appropriate penal proceedings as provided by law. Any finding under this paragraph shall require a majority vote of the committee; and

Conduct a study of any matter without regard to jurisdiction of the matter being conferred to another statutory or standing committee.

Each witness who appears before the committee by its subpoena or order, other than an officer or employee of the state, shall be entitled to the fees and mileage provided for witnesses in civil cases in Circuit Court, which shall be audited and paid upon the presentation of proper vouchers sworn to by such witnesses and approved by the chair of the committee.

The committee may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of documents, books, papers, or other records. Subpoenas may be issued by agreement of the co-chairs or by a vote of the majority of the members of the committee and shall be served in the same manner as subpoenas for witnesses in civil cases. All provisions of law relative to subpoenas issued in such cases, including compensation of witnesses, shall apply to subpoenas issued by the committee.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 254, § 2, effective March 30, 1978; 1980, ch. 328, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1992, ch. 79, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 2021 ch. 14, § 3, effective March 12, 2021.

6.912.
Enforcement of committee subpoenas — Penalty for failure to comply.

Any witness who fails to comply with a subpoena issued pursuant to KRS

6.910

may be fined by the committee an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day, up to a maximum total fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000). The committee shall have the authority to enforce compliance with subpoenas, including holding the noncompliant witness in contempt of the General Assembly which includes any action that could be taken by a Circuit Court to enforce compliance with a subpoena issued pursuant to the authority of a Kentucky Court of Justice. Upon petition by the committee, any Circuit Court within the jurisdiction of which any inquiry is being carried on or having jurisdiction over the witness may, in case of refusal to obey a subpoena or order of the committee, issue an order requiring compliance. Any failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as contempt thereof in addition to any other duly authorized punishment.

The Circuit Court shall render a final judgement within forty-five (45) days from the date:

When the petition was filed by the committee; or

Of the commencement of any action or motion by any witness seeking to quash or otherwise resist compliance with a subpoena issued by the committee.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 14, § 8, effective March 12, 2021.

6.915.
Information to be provided by state agencies.

Employees of state agencies shall provide the committee or its staff with necessary information for the performance of its duties, with any assistance needed to properly conduct the research or study, and with timely access in order to conduct the following functions, necessary to conduct any duly authorized study:

Reviewing, copying, or inspecting any public or confidential information either written or electronic;

Interviewing personnel; and

Inspecting or observing facilities, equipment, or operations.

Adequate facilities shall be provided for on-site research at the agency. Open access to original agency records and data shall be provided during normal working hours, without any restrictions or conditions imposed by the agency, and at the time and in the form requested by the committee or its staff.

The contents of interviews with agency personnel conducted by the committee or its staff or information supplied at the request of the committee or its staff, which is not specifically restricted under KRS

61.878

, may be classified as confidential by the public agency and not subject to release under KRS

61.872

. This subsection does not apply to reports or documents routinely maintained by the agency and subject to release under KRS

61.872

.

Employees of state agencies or programs shall cooperate with the committee or its staff and shall not withhold, destroy, or alter any documents or information requested or given to the committee or its staff.

No state agency or employee may interfere with any person complying with this section or take any punitive, administrative, or retaliatory action against a person for complying with this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 254, § 3, effective March 30, 1978; 1992, ch. 79, § 4, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 486, § 37, effective July 15, 1994.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Although the psychiatric and psychological evaluations found in an inmate’s parole review file are confidential, caution should be exercised upon any examination thereof; the Legislative Program Review and Investigations Committee and its staff may have access to the files, but should protect against the general release or publication of the material. Public discussion of this review should scrupulously avoid identification of individual inmates and the opinions expressed in the evaluations with respect to each of them.

OAG 91-86

.

6.916.
Information to be provided free of charge.

Any public officer or official, agency, or organization of state or local government required or requested to furnish information or data to the General Assembly or a committee thereof shall do so without fees or charges of any kind for the information or data or any cost associated with its gathering, processing, or production.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 231, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

6.920.
Additional powers.

The committee, while in the discharge of its official duties, shall have the following additional powers:

To subpoena and examine witnesses; to require the appearance of any person and the production of any paper or document; to order the appearance of any person for the purpose of producing any paper or document; and to issue all process necessary to compel such appearance or production. When such process has been served, the committee may compel obedience thereto by the attachment of the person, papers or records subpoenaed;

If any person fails or refuses to testify or furnish documentary evidence concerning any matter with respect to which the committee desires information pertaining to the studies in which it is engaged, the Franklin Circuit Court, on application of the committee, may compel obedience by proceedings for contempt as in the case of disobedience of a subpoena issued from the Circuit Court or a refusal to testify therein;

To administer oaths to witnesses appearing before the committee when, by a majority vote, the committee deems the administration of an oath necessary and advisable as provided by law; and

To determine that a witness has perjured himself by testifying falsely before the committee, and to institute appropriate penal proceedings as provided by law.

Each witness who appears before the committee by its order, other than officer or employee of the state, shall be entitled to the fees and mileage provided for witnesses in civil cases in Circuit Courts, which shall be audited and paid upon the presentation of proper vouchers sworn to by such witnesses and approved by the chairman of the committee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 254, § 4, effective March 30, 1978; 1980, ch. 328, § 3, effective July 15, 1980; 1992, ch. 79, § 5, effective July 14, 1992.

6.922.
Annual evaluation of external child fatality and near fatality review panel — Report to General Assembly.

Beginning in 2014 the Legislative Oversight and Investigations Committee of the Kentucky General Assembly shall conduct an annual evaluation of the external child fatality and near fatality review panel established pursuant to KRS

620.055

to monitor the operations, procedures, and recommendations of the panel and shall report its findings to the General Assembly.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 39, § 3, effective June 25, 2013; 2021 ch. 14, § 4, effective March 12, 2021.

6.925.
Committee may require testimony.

When making a study, the committee may require that testimony be given under oath, which may be administered by the chairman or by any person authorized by law to administer oaths. The committee may require that such testimony or any proceedings of the committee be recorded by an official court reporter or other competent person, under oath. The transcript, when written, certified and approved by the recorder and transcriber as being the direct transcript of the testimony, or proceedings, shall be prima facie a correct statement of said testimony or proceedings provided that the recorder and transcriber’s signature to such certificate is duly acknowledged by him before a notary public or a judicial official of the Commonwealth.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 254, § 5, effective March 30, 1978; 1992, ch. 79, § 6, effective July 14, 1992; 2021 ch. 14, § 5, effective March 12, 2021.

6.930.
Report of committee findings and recommendations.

The committee may report its findings and recommendations to the head of the state agency or program and the secretary of the cabinet to which the report pertains.

The secretary of the cabinet or the head of the state agency or program to which the report pertains shall give affirmative consideration to the report within sixty (60) days of the adoption of the report by:

Adopting the committee’s recommendations and reporting their actions to the committee; or

Otherwise correcting the deficiency and reporting their actions, and the reasons for not adopting the committee’s recommendations, to the committee.

If no corrective action is taken by the secretary of the cabinet or by the head of the state agency or program in response to a committee report under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, or if the committee deems the corrective action taken to be unsuitable, the committee may report the matter to the General Assembly, together with its recommendations.

The committee may report the results of each of its studies, including the committee’s recommendations for any further action, to the General Assembly.

The committee may report any matter under its study to any law enforcement agency, the Auditor of Public Accounts, or any other state official having jurisdiction over the matter for investigation. If a matter is referred under this subsection, the law enforcement agency, Auditor of Public Accounts, or other state official with jurisdiction over the matter shall make a report to the committee with its findings within thirty (30) days of completion of the investigation.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 254, § 6, effective March 30, 1978; 1992, ch. 79, § 7, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 486, § 38, effective July 15, 1994; 2021 ch. 14, § 6, effective March 12, 2021.

6.935.
Attorney General, Auditor of Public Accounts, and other officials to assist committee.

The Attorney General, or an assistant attorney general designated by him, the Auditor of Public Accounts, cabinet secretaries, and the heads of other state agencies shall assist the Legislative Oversight and Investigations Committee in whatever manner the co-chairs deem that these officials can be helpful.

Staffing and support services shall be provided to the Legislative Oversight and Investigations Committee pursuant to KRS

7.090

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 254, § 7, effective March 30, 1978; 1994, ch. 486, § 39, effective July 15, 1994; 2021 ch. 14, § 7, effective March 12, 2021.